Hawaii statutes.
[§431:4-238] Information to be furnished to
stockholders. (a) No solicitation shall be made unless the person
solicited is concurrently furnished or has previously been furnished with a
written proxy statement containing the information required under schedule A
pursuant to section 431:4-232.

(b) If the solicitation is made on behalf of
the management of the insurer and relates to an annual meeting of stockholders
at which directors are to be elected, each proxy statement furnished pursuant
to subsection (a) shall be accompanied or preceded by an annual report (in
preliminary or final form) to the stockholders containing the financial
statements for the last fiscal year as are included in the exhibit entitled
"stockholders information supplement-financial reporting to
stockholder". Subject to these requirements with respect to financial
statements, the annual report to stockholders may be in any form deemed
suitable by the management.

(c) Two copies of each annual report sent to
the stockholders pursuant to this part shall be mailed to the commissioner not
later than the date on which the annual report is first sent or given to
stockholders or the date on which preliminary copies of solicitation are filed
with the commissioner, pursuant to section 431:4-240(a), whichever date is
later. [L 2000, c 24, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next